Wyoming, session 2025, HB0194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470
Section 1. W.S. 6-4-301(a)(i) and (ii) and
6-4-302(c)(i) and by creating new subsections (d) through
(f) are amended to read:

6-4-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Disseminate" means to sell, distribute,
deliver, provide, exhibit, import, export, rent, lend,
transfer possession of or title to, provide, display, show,
present, broadcast, transmit, retransmit, communicate by
telephone, play, orally communicate, perform or otherwise
make available to another whether in person or
electronically;

(ii) "Material" includes any form of human
expression or communication intended for, or capable of,
visual, auditory or sensory perception.; This includes,
without limitation:

(A) A book, leaflet, pamphlet, magazine,
picture, drawing, photograph, film, negative, slide, motion
HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470
picture, figure, object, novelty, device, recording,
transcription, live or recorded telephone message or any
other similar item, whether tangible or intangible;

(B) A performance, exhibition, transmission
or distribution of any materials defined in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;

(C) A live performance or exhibition that
depicts nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement,
sadomasochistic behavior or abuse, as those terms are
defined in this subsection, whether to the public or an
audience of one (1) or more persons.

6-4-302. Promoting obscenity; penalties.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person who
may produce, reproduce, possess or disseminate obscene
material:

(i) In the course of law enforcement and
judicial activities or in the course of medical or mental
health care treatment;
HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470

(d) A person commits the crime of promoting obscenity
to a minor if he, knowing the character of the material
involved, knowingly:

(i) Disseminates, furnishes, presents, provides,
makes available, gives, lends, shows or advertises to a
minor material that is harmful to minors;

(ii) Provides, invites or promotes an event to
minors that includes material that is harmful to minors; or

(iii) Transmits or sends to a person that the
person believes is a minor by means of electronic mail,
personal messaging or any other direct internet
communication material that is harmful to minors when the
person knows or believes at the time of transmission that a
minor in this state will receive that material.

(e) Promoting obscenity to a minor is a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine not to exceed six thousand dollars
($6,000.00) or by imprisonment for not to exceed one (1)
year, or both.
HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470

(f) For purposes of subsection (d) of this section:

(i) "Harmful to minors" means that quality of
any description, exhibition, presentation or
representation, in whatever form, of nudity, sexual
conduct, sexual excitement or sadomasochistic abuse, when
the material or performance has the following
characteristics:

(A) The average person eighteen (18) years
of age or older would find that the material or performance
has a predominant tendency to appeal to a prurient interest
in sex to minors;

(B) The average person eighteen (18) years
of age or older would find that the material or performance
depicts or describes nudity, sexual conduct, sexual
excitement or sadomasochistic abuse in a manner that is
patently offensive to prevailing standards in the adult
community with respect to what is suitable for minors; and

HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470
(C) The material or performance lacks
serious literary, scientific, medical, artistic or
political value for minors.

(ii) "Nudity" means a:

(A) Showing of the human male or female
genitals, pubic area or buttocks with no covering or less
than a fully opaque covering;

(B) Showing of the female breast with no
covering or less than a fully opaque covering of any
portion of the female breast below the top of the nipple;
or

(C) Depiction of covered male genitals in a
discernibly turgid state.

(iii) "Sexual conduct" means:

(A) Any act of sexual intercourse,
masturbation, excretory functions, lewd exhibition of the
genitals, sadomasochistic abuse or bestiality;
HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470

(B) Any other physical contact with a
person's unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks or female
breast, whether alone or between members of the same or
opposite sex or between a human and an animal, in an act of
sexual stimulation or attempting to sexually stimulate,
gratification or perversion;

(C) Any sexual or gender-oriented material
that knowingly exposes minors to persons who are dressed in
sexually revealing, exaggerated or provocative clothing or
costumes, or are stripping, or engaged in lewd or
lascivious dancing or movements, presentations or
activities in any place where minors are expected, invited
or are known to be present.

(iv) "Sexual intercourse" means coitus or
copulation, whether genital-genital, oral-genital,
anal-genital or oral-anal, and whether between persons of
the same or opposite sex or between a human and an animal.

Section 2. W.S. 6-4-302(b)(ii) and (c)(ii) is
repealed.
HB0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0470

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0194